Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB40.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Do-Not-Sell Firearm Registry Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firearm." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions)."List." The Pennsylvania Do-Not-Sell List established under this act."Personal information." The following:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) Full name.(2) Date of birth.(3) Address.(4) Telephone number."Registrant." An individual who voluntarily registers for the list either through an Internet website or hard copy form."Registry." The Do-Not-Sell Firearm Registry authorized under this act.Section 3. Do-Not-Sell Firearm Registry.(a) Establishment.--Within one year of the effective date of this section, the Pennsylvania State Police shall develop and launch a secure Internet-based registry, to be known as the Do-Not-Sell Firearm Registry, to allow an individual residing in this Commonwealth to voluntarily register the individual's personal information on a list to be established and known as the Pennsylvania Do-Not-Sell List.(b) Protections.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the list credibly:(1) Verifies the identity of a registrant.(2) Prevents unauthorized disclosures of registrants.(3) Informs the registrant of the legal effects of registration.(c) Forms.--Within six months of the effective date of this section, the Pennsylvania State Police shall develop and widely distribute a hard copy form to allow an individual to register the individual's personal information on the registry and a form for an individual to request removal of personal information from the registry. The forms may be:(1) uploaded to an Internet-based platform with a photocopy of a government-issued photo identification;20250SB0040PN0791 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) submitted in person at a county clerk's office with a government-issued photo identification;(3) mailed to the Pennsylvania State Police with a photocopy of a government-issued photo identification; or(4) transmitted by text message to the Pennsylvania State Police with a picture of a government-issued photo identification.(d) Email notification option.--(1) The registry and registration form shall provide the option of entering up to five email addresses for email notifications.(2) The registrant may provide email addresses at the time of registration or any time after registration.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit a notice to the email address or email addresses as provided if the registrant subsequently seeks to remove the registrant's name from the registry.(e) Record of personal information in databases.--After a registrant provides personal information and is placed on the registry, the Pennsylvania State Police shall record that information in the Pennsylvania Instant Check System and the NICS Index Denied Persons File.Section 4. Unlawful sale or delivery of firearms to registrant.(a) Unlawful activity.--A firearm importer, firearm manufacturer or firearm dealer licensed under the laws of this Commonwealth, or an entity or individual dealing in firearms required to perform a background check, may not sell or deliver a firearm to a registrant.(b) Penalty.--Violation of subsection (a) shall be punishable by a fine up to $10,000 and imprisonment for no more 20250SB0040PN0791 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 than one year.Section 5. Removal from registry.(a) Removal by request.--A registrant may request that the registrant's personal information be removed from the registry by one of the methods listed under section 3 for registration. Twenty-one days after the request for removal is received, the Pennsylvania State Police shall remove the requesting registrant from the Pennsylvania Instant Check System and notify the FBI to remove the requesting registrant from the NICS Index Denied Persons File. The Pennsylvania State Police shall purge all records of the registration and removal of the registrant's personal information from the registry.(b) Removal by court.--The personal information of a registrant may be immediately removed from the registry by applying for immediate removal to Commonwealth Court and proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the registrant does not pose a risk of self harm or a harm to public safety. The proceeding may allow evidence from a public official or interested party.Section 6. Unlawful activity.(a) Inquiries.--It shall be unlawful for an individual or entity to inquire as to whether an individual is registered on the registry or has personal information on the list for any purpose other than to determine an individual's eligibility to purchase, possess or transport a firearm. Violations of this subsection are punishable by a civil fine of up to $10,000.(b) Discrimination.--It shall be unlawful for a person to discriminate against an individual with respect to health care services, employment, education, housing, insurance, governmental benefits or contracting because the individual is 20250SB0040PN0791 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered on the registry or has personal information on the list. Violations of this subsection shall be punishable by a civil fine of up to $10,000.(c) Unlawful disclosure.--A person who obtains personal information relating to a registrant from the registry or list shall not disclose that personal information. Violations of this subsection shall be punishable by a fine of up to $10,000 and imprisonment for no more than one year.(d) False information.--It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly give false information or to make false statements with the intent of enrolling or removing an individual from the registry or list. Violations of this subsection shall be punishable by a fine of up to $10,000 and imprisonment for no more than one year.Section 7. Confidentiality.(a) List not admissible as evidence.--Except as necessary to enforce section 6, neither the personal information of a registrant nor the fact that the personal information was removed from the registry shall be admissible as evidence in a legal proceeding.(b) List not subject to Right-to-Know Law.--The contents of the list, including personal information of registrants, shall not be subject to disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.Section 8. Opportunity for individuals to register.(a) Hospital visit after attempted suicide.--An employee of an acute care hospital or an emergency facility in which an individual receives treatment after a probable suicide attempt may, as a nonbinding matter of best practice, present the individual with the opportunity to register for the list.20250SB0040PN0791 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Suicide hotline.--A suicide hotline maintained or operated by an entity funded in whole or in part by the Commonwealth may, as a nonbinding matter of best practice, inform callers about the opportunity to register for the list.(c) Department of Transportation.--Driver license and photo license centers operated by the Department of Transportation shall offer individuals the opportunity to register for the list.(d) State boards.--The State Board of Medicine, the State Board of Nursing and the State Board of Psychology shall notify all licensees of the existence of the list within 60 days after the effective date of this section.Section 9. Advertising.The Department of Health, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, shall develop and implement a publicity and advertising campaign that, at a minimum, provides the public with information about the list, how to register for the list and contacts for additional information regarding the list.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0040PN0791 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021